Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.772

Risk management—Procurement of insurance for municipalities.

The director, through the office of risk management, may purchase, or contract for the purchase of, property and liability insurance for any municipality upon request of the municipality.

As used in this section, "municipality" means any city, town, county, special purpose district, municipal corporation, or political subdivision of the state of Washington.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 504; 2002 c 332 s 6; 1985 c 188 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.41.320, 43.19.1936.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.